District of Columbia statutes.
47-4005

Rules.

(a)

The Mayor shall, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter.

(b)

The rules shall include standards for:

(1)

The transfer of funds to the Fund; and

(2)

The reimbursement of costs incurred by the Mayor in the collection, processing, accounting, or disbursement of the funds generated by the tax check-off.

History

Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-246, § 7, 38 DCR 371
Nov. 20, 1993, D.C. Law 10-56, § 10, 40 DCR 7222
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-4005.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 14-213, in the table of contents of this chapter, substituted “§ 47-4108.01. Special agents for the Office of Tax and Revenue.” for “§ 47-4108a. Special agents for the Office of Tax and Revenue.”